Utah statutes.
13-42-120.   Cancellation of agreement -- Waiver.
(1)  An individual may cancel an agreement before midnight of the third
business day after the individual assents to it, unless the agreement does not
comply with Subsection (2) or Section 13-42-119 or Section 13-42-128, in which
event the individual may cancel the agreement within 30 days after the
individual assents to it.  To exercise the right to cancel, the individual
must give notice in a record to the provider.  Notice by mail is given when
mailed.
(2)  An agreement must be accompanied by a form that contains in bold-face
type, surrounded by bold black lines:
Notice of Right to Cancel
You may cancel this agreement, without any penalty or obligation, at any time
before midnight of the third business day that begins the day after you agree
to it by electronic communication or by signing it.
To cancel this agreement during this period, send an e-mail to
____________________________ or mail or deliver a signed, dated copy of this
E-mail address of provider
notice, or any other written notice to ___________________________________
Name of provider
at _______________________________ before midnight on ___________________.
Address of provider                                              Date
If you cancel this agreement within the 3-day period, we will refund all money
you already have paid us.
You also may terminate this agreement at any later time, but we may not be
required to refund fees you have paid us.
I cancel this agreement,
__________________________________
Print your name
__________________________________
Signature
__________________________________
   Date
(3)  If a personal financial emergency necessitates the disbursement of an
individual's money to one or more of the individual's creditors before the
expiration of three days after an agreement is signed, an individual may waive
the right to cancel.  To waive the right, the individual must send or deliver
a signed, dated statement in the individual's own words describing the
circumstances that necessitate a waiver.  The waiver must explicitly waive the
right to cancel.  A waiver by means of a standard form record is void.
